Hawaii statutes.
§46-42 Reports by fiscal officers. The
director of finance of each county shall prepare and submit to the council,
transmit to the comptroller of the State, and publish in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county, immediately following the close of each fiscal year,
a statement of income and expenditure by funds, showing the principal sources
of revenue, the function or purpose for which expenditures were made, together
with a consolidated statement showing similar information for all funds; also a
statement showing the balance in each fund at the beginning of the fiscal year,
plus the receipts minus the disbursements, and the balance on hand at the close
of the fiscal year after deducting outstanding warrants and vouchers.

The director of finance may publish totals of
expenses made by administrative departments for administration and executive
purposes. [L 1913, c 21, §1; am L 1917, c 205, §1; RL 1925, §2173; am L 1927, c
46, §1; RL 1935, §2313; am L 1941, c 248, §1; RL 1945, §6004; RL 1955, §138-7;
am L 1957, c 152, §1; am imp L 1965, c 166, §1; HRS §46-42; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

County auditor publishes annual report and board of
supervisors awards contract and printing of same. 36 H. 355.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next